Mississippi, session 2026, HB1741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 47-5-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-10.  (1)  The department shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To accept adult offenders committed to it by the courts of this state for incarceration, care, custody, treatment and rehabilitation; (b)  To provide for the care, custody, study, training, supervision and treatment of adult offenders committed to the department; (c)  To maintain, administer and exercise executive and administrative supervision over all state correctional institutions and facilities used for the custody, training, care, treatment and after-care supervision of adult offenders committed to the department; provided, however, that such supervision shall not extend to any institution or facility for which executive and administrative supervision has been provided by law through another agency; (d)  To plan, develop and coordinate a statewide, comprehensive correctional program designed to train and rehabilitate offenders in order to prevent, control and retard recidivism; (e)  To maintain records of persons committed to it, and to establish programs of research, statistics and planning: (i)  An offender's records shall include a single cover sheet that contains the following information about the offender:  name, including any aliases; department inmate number; social security number; photograph; court of conviction; cause number; date of conviction; date of sentence; total number of days in the department's custody or number of days creditable toward time served on each charge; date of actual custody; and date of any revocation of a suspended sentence; (ii)  The department shall maintain an offender's cover sheet in the course of its regularly conducted business activities and shall include an offender's cover sheet in each request from a court, prosecutor or law enforcement agency for a summary of an offender's records with the department, also known as a "pen-pack." The cover sheet shall conform to Rules 803(6) and 803(8) of the Mississippi Rules of Evidence for admission as an exception to the hearsay rule and may be admissible when properly authenticated according to evidentiary rules and when offered for the purpose of enhanced sentencing under Section 41-29-147, 99-19-81 or 99-19-83 or other similar purposes; and (iii)  This subsection is not intended to conflict with an offender's right of confrontation in criminal proceedings under the state or federal constitution; (f)  To investigate the grievances of any person committed to the department, and to inquire into any alleged misconduct by employees; and for this purpose it may issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of writings and papers, and may examine under oath any witnesses who may appear before it; (g)  To administer programs of training and development of personnel of the department; (h)  To develop and implement diversified programs and facilities to promote, enhance, provide and assure the opportunities for the successful custody, training and treatment of adult offenders properly committed to the department or confined in any facility under its control.  Such programs and facilities may include, but not be limited to, institutions, group homes, halfway houses, diagnostic centers, work and educational release centers, technical violation centers, restitution centers, counseling and supervision of probation, parole, suspension and compact cases, presentence investigating and other state and local community-based programs and facilities; (i)  To receive, hold and use, as a corporate body, any real, personal and mixed property donated to the department, and any other corporate authority as shall be necessary for the operation of any facility at present or hereafter; (j)  To provide those personnel, facilities, programs and services the department shall find necessary in the operation of a modern correctional system for the custody, care, study and treatment of adult offenders placed under its jurisdiction by the courts and other agencies in accordance with law; (k)  To develop the capacity and administrative network necessary to deliver advisory consultation and technical assistance to units of local government for the purpose of assisting them in developing model local correctional programs for adult offenders; (l)  To cooperate with other departments and agencies and with local communities for the development of standards and programs for better correctional services in this state; (m)  To administer all monies and properties of the department; (n)  To report annually to the Legislature and the Governor on the committed persons, institutions and programs of the department; (o)  To cooperate with the courts and with public and private agencies and officials to assist in attaining the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 7 of this title.  The department may enter into agreements and contracts with other departments of federal, state or local government and with private agencies concerning the discharge of its responsibilities or theirs.  The department shall have the authority to accept and expend or use gifts, grants and subsidies from public and private sources; (p)  To make all rules and regulations and exercise all powers and duties vested by law in the department; (q)  The department may require a search of all persons entering the grounds and facilities at the correctional system; (r)  To submit, in a timely manner, to the Oversight Task Force established in Section 47-5-6 any reports required by law or regulation or requested by the task force; * * *and (s) To provide monthly rodent and pest control services at all state correctional facilities; and ( * * *st)  To discharge any other power or duty imposed or established by law. (2) The department is hereby established as a Local Educational Agency and an Educational Service Agency both as defined in 34 CFR Section 300, to receive Title I, Part B funding and other available funding and to provide educational services to eligible incarcerated students.  The department is authorized, if necessary, to adopt policies and procedures to carry out its responsibilities as a Local Educational Agency and an Educational Service Agency. SECTION 2.  Section 47-5-94, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-94.  The Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Board of Health are hereby authorized and directed, upon the passage of this section, to institute permanent annual structural and environmental inspections of institutional housing and service facilities at the State Penitentiary, such inspections to include, but not be limited to, structural soundness, repairs and maintenance of buildings; food service; fire and safety hazards; fresh water supply; wastewater system; sewage collection and treatment; solid waste collection, storage and disposal * * *; rodent and pest control and general institutional housekeeping.  Beginning July 1, 2025, the Mississippi State Department of Health shall conduct an annual structural and environmental inspection of the infirmary at the State Penitentiary at Parchman and make a report thereon as required in this section.  Beginning July 1, 2026, the Mississippi State Department of Health shall conduct monthly inspections of all state correctional facilities for rodent and pest control, and shall make a report thereon as required in this section. All other state agencies, authorities, boards, commissions and departments are hereby directed, upon the request of the Commissioner of Corrections, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the State Board of Health, to assist in such inspections with the fullest degree of reasonable cooperation. Within thirty (30) days of the completion of the inspections provided for herein, the participants shall compile a written report of their findings which shall be submitted to the Governor, the Commissioner of Corrections and the Warden or Superintendent of the State Penitentiary at Parchman. SECTION 3.  Section 1 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage, and Section 2 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.